Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 167.310 to
167.351.
SECTION 2. (1) A person commits the crime of interfering with an  investigation into an
offense against an animal if the person intentionally or knowingly conceals an animal,
transports an  animal or takes other action to prevent a peace officer, as defined in ORS
161.015, or a licensed veterinarian from examining an animal suspected of being the subject
of a violation under ORS 167.310 to 167.390.
(2) Interfering with an investigation into an  offense against an animal is a Class A
misdemeanor.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 167.320 is amended to read:
167.320. (1) A person commits the crime of animal abuse in  the first degree if, except as other-
wise authorized by law, the person [ intentionally, knowingly or ] recklessly[ :]
[(a)] causes serious physical injury or death to an animal[ ; or ]
[(b) Cruelly causes the death of an animal ].
(2) Any practice of good animal husbandry is not a violation of this section.
(3) Animal abuse in the first degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, animal abuse in the first  degree is a Class C
felony if:
(a) The person committing the animal abuse has previously been  convicted of one or more of the
following offenses:
(A) Any offense under ORS  163.160, 163.165, 163.175, 163.185 or 163.187 or the equivalent laws
of another jurisdiction, if  the offense involved domestic violence as defined in ORS 135.230 or the
offense was committed against a minor child; or
(B) Any offense under this section or ORS 167.322, or the equivalent  laws of another jurisdic-
tion; or
(b) The person  knowingly commits the animal abuse in the immediate presence of a minor child.
For purposes of this paragraph, a minor child is  in the immediate presence of animal abuse if the
abuse is seen or directly perceived in any other manner by the minor child.
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 1
(5) When animal abuse in the first degree  is a felony, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
shall classify the offense as crime category 6 of the sentencing guidelines grid.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (5)  of this section, when animal abuse in the first degree
is a felony because  of circumstances described in subsection (4)(b) of this section, the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission shall classify the  offense as crime category 7 of the sentencing
guidelines grid.
SECTION 4.  ORS 167.322 is amended to read:
167.322. (1) A person commits the crime of aggravated animal abuse in the first degree if , except
as otherwise authorized by law,  the person  intentionally or knowingly:
[(a) Maliciously kills an animal; or ]
[(b) Intentionally or knowingly tortures an animal. ]
(a) Tortures an animal; or
(b) Causes serious physical injury or death to an animal.
(2) Any practice of good animal husbandry is not a violation of this section.
[(2)] (3) Aggravated animal abuse in the first degree is a Class C felony and the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission shall classify the offense as crime category 6 of the sentencing guidelines grid.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of  this section, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commis-
sion shall classify the offense of aggravated animal abuse in the first degree as crime  cate-
gory 7 of the sentencing guidelines grid if:
(a) The person committing  the animal abuse has previously been convicted of one or
more of the following offenses:
(A) Any offense under ORS 163.160, 163.165, 163.175, 163.185 or 163.187 or the  equivalent
laws of another jurisdiction, if the  offense involved domestic violence as defined in ORS
135.230 or the offense was committed against a minor child; or
(B) Any offense under this section or ORS 167.320,  or the equivalent laws of another ju-
risdiction; or
(b) The person knowingly commits the animal  abuse in the immediate presence of a mi-
nor child. For purposes of this paragraph, a minor child is in the immediate presence of an-
imal abuse if the abuse is seen or directly perceived in any other manner by the minor child.
[(3)] (5) As used in this section[ :]
[(a) “Maliciously” means intentionally acting with a depravity of mind and  reckless and wanton
disregard of life. ]
[(b)], “torture” means an action taken for the primary purpose of inflicting pain.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 167.322 by section 4 of this 2024 Act do not  affect
the application of the exceptions in ORS 167.335.
SECTION 6.  ORS 167.330 is amended to read:
167.330. (1) A person commits the crime of animal neglect in the first degree if, except as oth-
erwise authorized  by law, the person intentionally, knowingly, recklessly or with criminal
negligence:
(a) Fails  to provide minimum care for an animal in the person’s custody or control and the
failure to provide care results in serious physical injury or death to the animal; or
(b) Tethers a domestic animal in the person’s custody or control  and the tethering results in
serious physical injury or death to the domestic animal.
(2) Animal neglect in the first degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, animal neglect in the first degree is  a Class
C felony if:
(a) The person committing the offense has previously been convicted of one  or more offenses
under this section, ORS 167.325 or the equivalent laws of another jurisdiction;
(b) The offense was part of a criminal episode involving 10 or more animals; [ or]
(c) The person committing the offense acts intentionally, knowingly or recklessly as to
the serious physical injury or death of the animal; or
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 2
[(c)] (d) The person knowingly commits the  offense in the immediate presence of a minor child.
For purposes of this paragraph, a minor child is in the immediate presence of animal  neglect if the
neglect is seen or directly perceived in any other manner by the minor child.
(4) The Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission shall classify animal neglect in the first degree
under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) As crime category 6 if 10 to 40 animals were the subject of the neglect.
(b) As crime category 7 if more than 40 animals were the subject of the neglect or if  the offense
is a felony because of circumstances described in subsection (3)(a) or [ (c)] (d) of this section.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 167.332 is amended to read:
167.332. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section:
(a) In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of violating ORS 167.315,
167.340 or 167.355 or of a misdemeanor under ORS 167.320, 167.325 or  167.330 or this section  may
not possess or reside with  any  animal of the same genus against which the crime was committed
or any domestic animal for a period of five years following entry of the conviction.
(b) In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of violating ORS 167.322,
167.333, 167.365 or 167.428 or of a felony under ORS 167.320, 167.325 or 167.330 may not possess  or
reside with any animal of the same genus against which the crime was committed or  any domestic
animal for a  period of 15 years following entry of the conviction. [ However, the sentencing court may
reduce the prohibition period if the person successfully completes mental health treatment approved  by
the court. ]
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5)(d) of this section,  a person who possesses or resides
with an animal in violation of  this section commits a Class [ C] B  misdemeanor. When a person is
convicted of possessing  or residing  with an animal in violation of this section, as part of the sen-
tence the court may order the  removal of that animal from the person’s  possession or  residence
and as a condition  of the person’s probation may prohibit the person from possessing or residing
with any animal of the same genus that the person unlawfully possessed or resided with under this
section or against which the underlying  violation of ORS 167.315, 167.320, 167.322, 167.325, 167.330,
167.333, 167.340, 167.355, 167.365 or 167.428 or this section  was committed.
(3) The [ animal possession ] prohibition described in subsection (1) of this  section does not apply
to a person’s first  conviction if the person is the owner of a commercial livestock operation and the
underlying violation of ORS 167.315, 167.320, 167.322, 167.325, 167.330, 167.333, 167.340, 167.355,
167.365 or 167.428 was committed against livestock.
(4)(a) A person subject  to [ an animal possession ] a prohibition described in subsection (1) of this
section may file a motion with the sentencing court requesting a  waiver of the prohibition. The
person must file a sworn affidavit in support of the motion stating that:
(A) The person’s conviction leading to the [ possession ] prohibition involved only livestock;
(B) During the two years before the conviction triggering the prohibition, the person was the
owner of a commercial livestock operation;
(C) The person  has not been convicted, in the previous five years, of a crime involving animals
or domestic violence or a crime where the victim was under 18 years of age; and
(D) The person’s conviction was the result of:
(i) Criminal liability for the conduct of another person under ORS 161.155 (2)(c);
(ii) Criminal liability of a corporation as described in ORS  161.170, and the person is a corpo-
ration; or
(iii) Animal  neglect as described in ORS 167.325 or 167.330 and the person’s criminal conduct
was not knowing or intentional.
(b) When a person files a motion and affidavit described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
sentencing court shall hold a hearing. At the hearing, the sentencing court shall grant the  motion
if the person proves by clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) Continued enforcement of the  prohibition against possessing  or residing with  livestock
would result in substantial economic hardship that cannot otherwise be mitigated;
(B) The person no longer poses any risk to animals; and
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 3
(C) The person is capable of providing  and willing to provide necessary, adequate and appro-
priate levels of care for  all livestock that would come within the person’s custody or control if the
petition is granted.
(c) When deciding a  motion filed under this subsection, the sentencing court may consider the
person’s financial circumstances and mental health in determining whether the person is  capable
of adequately caring for livestock.
(d) If the sentencing court grants the motion described in  this subsection, the waiver of the
prohibition against possessing  or residing with  animals shall  apply only to livestock. The sentenc-
ing court shall further order that for five years the person must consent to  reasonable inspections
by law enforcement and the United States Department of Agriculture to ensure the  welfare of the
livestock under the person’s custody or control. A refusal to consent to  a reasonable inspection
described in this paragraph is contempt of court and, if the person is found in contempt, shall  result
in the sentencing court revoking the waiver of the [ possession ] prohibition.
(e) As used in this subsection,  “commercial livestock operation” means a  licensed business en-
gaged in the raising, breeding or selling of livestock for profit.
(5)(a) A person subject to a prohibition described in  subsection (1) of this section may file
a motion with the sentencing court requesting  a termination of the prohibition, a reduction
in the length of the prohibition or an amendment of the prohibition to  exclude certain cate-
gories of animals or  certain specific animals, unless the underlying conviction was for in-
tentional or knowing conduct. The person must:
(A) File a sworn affidavit in support of the motion stating that,  apart from the underly-
ing offense, the person has not been previously convicted of a violation of ORS 167.315,
167.333, 167.340, 167.355, 167.365 or 167.428, of a misdemeanor or a felony under ORS 167.320,
167.325 or 167.330, or of a violation of the equivalent laws of another jurisdiction.
(B) Serve a copy of the  motion upon the office of the prosecuting attorney who prose-
cuted the offense.
(b) When  a person files a motion described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the sen-
tencing court shall hold a hearing. At the hearing, the sentencing court shall consider:
(A) The nature of the underlying offense;
(B) The number of animals involved in the underlying offense;
(C) The degree of violence and criminal intent involved in the underlying offense;
(D) Other criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of  the person both before and after
the underlying conviction;
(E) The period of time during which the person has not reoffended;
(F) Whether the person has successfully completed a  court-approved treatment program
related to animal care and welfare; and
(G) Any other relevant factors.
(c) If, after a hearing described in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, the sentencing court
is satisfied  by clear and convincing evidence that the person no longer poses any risk to
animals under the person’s custody or control, the sentencing court shall:
(A) Enter an order terminating the  prohibition, reducing the length of the prohibition,
amending the prohibition to exclude certain  categories of animals or amending the prohibi-
tion to exclude certain specific animals.
(B) Order that, for five years, the person must consent to reasonable inspections by law
enforcement and the United  States Department of Agriculture to ensure the welfare of any
animals under the person’s custody or control.  A refusal to consent to a reasonable in-
spection described in this subparagraph constitutes contempt  of court and, if the person is
found in contempt, shall  result in the sentencing court revoking the order described in sub-
paragraph (A) of this paragraph.
(d) A person whose motion under this subsection has been granted and who possesses
or resides with an animal in violation of an order described in paragraph  (c)(A) of this sub-
section commits a Class A misdemeanor. If a person  is convicted of a violation described in
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 4
this paragraph, as part of the  sentence the sentencing court may order the removal of the
animal from the person’s possession or residence.
SECTION 8.  ORS 167.350 is amended to read:
167.350. (1)(a) In addition to and not in lieu of any other sentence it may impose, a court [ may]
shall require a defendant convicted under ORS 167.315  to 167.333, 167.340, 167.355 or 167.365 to
forfeit any rights of the defendant in the animal subjected to the violation, and to  repay the rea-
sonable costs incurred by a government agency,  a humane investigation agency or its agent or a
person prior to judgment in caring for each animal associated with the criminal proceeding.
(b) If  a government agency or a humane investigation agency or its agent provides care and
treatment for impounded or seized animals, a court that orders a defendant  to repay reasonable
costs of care under paragraph  (a) of this subsection may not reduce the incurred cost amount based
on the agency having received donations or other funding for the care.
(2)(a) When the court orders the defendant’s rights in the animal to be forfeited, the  court may
further order that those rights be given over to an  appropriate person or agency demonstrating a
willingness to accept and care for the animal or to the  county or an appropriate animal care agency
for further disposition in accordance with accepted practices for humane treatment of animals. The
court may not transfer the defendant’s rights in the animal to  any person who resides with the de-
fendant.
(b) This subsection does not limit the right of the person or  agency to whom rights are granted
to resell or otherwise make disposition of the animal.  A transfer of rights under this subsection
constitutes a transfer of ownership. The court shall require a  person to whom rights are granted to
execute an agreement to  provide minimum care to the animal. The agreement must indicate that
allowing the defendant to possess  or reside with  the animal constitutes a crime.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other sentence it  may impose, a court may order the
owner or person having custody of an animal to repay any reasonable costs incurred by a govern-
ment agency, a humane investigation agency or its agent or a  person in providing minimum care to
the animal that are not included in a repayment order under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A court may order a person convicted under  ORS 167.315 to 167.333, 167.340, 167.355, 167.365
or 167.428  to participate in available animal cruelty prevention programs or education programs,
or both, or to obtain psychological counseling for treatment  of mental health disorders that, in the
court’s judgment, contributed to the commission of the crime. The person shall bear any costs  in-
curred by the person for participation in counseling or treatment programs under this subsection.
(5) ORS 131.550 to 131.600 do not apply to the forfeiture of an animal  subjected to a violation
of ORS  167.315 to 167.333, 167.340, 167.355, 167.365 or 167.428. Any such animal is subject to forfei-
ture as provided in ORS 167.347 and  subsections (1) to (3) of this section  or, if the animal is a
fighting bird, as provided in ORS 167.435.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 105.597 is amended to read:
105.597. In addition to any places described in ORS 105.555, the following  are declared to be
nuisances and shall be enjoined and abated as provided in ORS 105.550 to 105.600:
(1) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of  the
following activities, except with regard to activities and animals described under ORS  167.335,
whether or not carried out with a particular mental state:
(a) Causing physical injury or serious physical  injury,  both as defined in ORS 167.310,  or
[cruelly] causing death.
(b) [ Killing maliciously as defined in ORS 167.322 or ] Committing torture as  defined in ORS
167.322.
(c) Failing to provide minimum care as defined in ORS 167.310.
(d) Possession of or residing with  a domestic animal as defined in ORS 167.310 by  a person
described under ORS 167.332.
(2) Any place appearing to be vacant at which a  domestic animal or equine, both as defined in
ORS 167.310, are present and have been left without provision for minimum care as defined in  ORS
167.310.
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 5
(3) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of  the
following activities, whether or not carried out with a particular mental state:
(a) Training or keeping  an animal for use in an exhibition of fighting as defined in ORS 167.355.
(b) Preparing for, occupation for, promoting, conducting or participating in an exhibition of
fighting as defined in ORS 167.355.
(c) Possessing, keeping, breeding, training,  buying, selling or offering for sale a fighting dog as
defined in ORS 167.360.
(d) Promoting, conducting, participating in or performing services in furtherance  of a dogfight
as defined in ORS 167.360.
(e) Occupation, keeping or use of the place for a dogfight as defined in ORS 167.360.
(f) Exchanging for commerce raw  fur of a domestic cat or dog as defined in ORS 167.390, or
products that include the fur of a domestic cat or dog, if the fur is  obtained through a process that
kills or maims the domestic cat or dog.
(g) Possessing, keeping, rearing, training, buying, selling or  offering for sale a fighting bird as
defined in ORS 167.426.
(h) Promoting, conducting, participating in or performing services in  furtherance of a cockfight
as defined in ORS 167.426.
(i) Occupation, keeping or use of the place for a cockfight as defined in ORS 167.426.
(4) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of  the
following  activities:
(a) Sexual assault of an animal as described in ORS 167.333.
(b) Possession of dogfighting paraphernalia as described under ORS 167.372.
(c) Selling or offering for sale  equipment other than paraphernalia described in paragraph (b)
of this subsection with the intent that the equipment be used to train a fighting dog  as defined in
ORS 167.360.
(d) Possessing, controlling or otherwise  having charge at the same time of more than 50 sexually
intact dogs that are two or more years of age for the primary purpose of reproduction.
(e) Manufacturing, buying, selling, bartering, exchanging, possessing  or offering for sale a gaff
or slasher as those terms are defined in ORS 167.426, or other  sharp implement designed for at-
tachment to the leg of a  fighting bird as defined in ORS 167.426, with the intent that the gaff,
slasher or other sharp implement be used in a cockfight as defined in ORS 167.426.
(f) Manufacturing, buying, selling, bartering, exchanging, possessing or offering for sale equip-
ment other than equipment described in paragraph (e) of this  subsection with the intent that the
equipment be used to train or handle a fighting  bird as defined in ORS 167.426 or to enhance the
fighting ability of a fighting bird.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 686.040 is amended to read:
686.040. (1) ORS  686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to commissioned veterinary officers of the United
States Army, or those in the employ of other  United States Government agencies while engaged in
their official capacity, unless they enter into a private practice.
(2) Nothing in ORS 167.322 or 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as  to prevent any person or
the agent or employee of the person  from practicing veterinary medicine and surgery or dentistry
in a humane manner on any  animal belonging to the person, agent or employee or for gratuitous
services or from dehorning and vaccinating cattle for the person, agent or employee.
(3) Nothing in ORS 686.020 (1)(a) shall be  so construed as to prevent the selling of veterinary
remedies and instruments by a licensed pharmacist at the regular place  of business of the licensed
pharmacist.
(4) A practitioner of allied health  methods may practice that method on animals without vio-
lating ORS  686.020 (1)(a), as long as the practice is in conformance with laws and rules governing
the practitioner’s practice and the practice is upon referral from a  licensed veterinarian for treat-
ment or therapy specified by the veterinarian.
(5) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the  lay testing of poultry by the whole blood
agglutination test.
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 6
(6) A certified euthanasia technician holding an active, current certificate may inject  sodium
pentobarbital, sedative and analgesic medications and any other euthanasia substance approved  by
the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board without violating ORS 686.020 (1)(a).
(7) The board by rule  may specify circumstances under which unlicensed persons may give
vaccinations, administer an anesthetic or otherwise assist in the practice of veterinary medicine.
(8) Any individual licensed  as a veterinarian in another state may be used in consultation in this
state with a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state  provided the consultation
does not exceed 30 days in any 365 consecutive days.
(9) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply  to authorized representatives of the State Department of
Agriculture in the discharge of any duty authorized by the department.
(10) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to an unlicensed representative of a livestock  association,
cow-testing association, or poultry association who, for the benefit of the association, takes  blood
samples for laboratory tests for the diagnosis of livestock or poultry  diseases, but only if this person
has received authorization from the State Department of Agriculture following a written request  to
the department.
(11) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to persons permitted by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to rehabilitate orphaned, sick or injured wildlife, as defined in ORS 496.004, for the purpose
of restoring the animals to the wild.
(12) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to students,  agents or employees of public or private ed-
ucational or medical research institutions involved  in educational or research activities under the
auspices of those institutions.
(13) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) Veterinarians employed by Oregon State University;
(b) Instructors of veterinary courses; or
(c) Students  of veterinary science who participate in the diagnosis and treatment of animals if
the students:
(A) Are participating in the diagnosis and treatment of animals while engaged in an  educational
program approved  by the board or a college of veterinary medicine accredited by the American
Veterinary Medical Association; and
(B) Are  under the direct supervision of an Oregon licensed veterinarian or a veterinarian ap-
proved by the board or Oregon State University to supervise students in the educational program.
SECTION 11.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act and the  amendments to ORS 105.597, 167.320,
167.322, 167.330, 167.332, 167.350 and 686.040 by sections 3, 4 and 6 to 10  of this 2024 Act apply
to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 12. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 7
Passed by House February 15, 2024
Repassed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4043 (HB 4043-B) Page 8